North Carolina, session 2025, SB492.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this act, the following definitions
apply:
(1) Building Code. – The North Carolina Building Code.
(2) Building Code Council. – The North Carolina Building Code Council.
(3) Group R-2 occupancy. – A multifamily residential building, as defined in the
Building Code. This does not include three- and four-family dwellings under
the rulemaking authority of the North Carolina Residential Code Council.
(4) Qualifying R-2 building. – A Group R-2 occupancy building that contains
between five and 32 dwelling units, having a total height of 75 feet or less
above grade plane, and located solely on an individual lot.
SECTION 1.(b) Temporary Provisions. – Until the effective date of the permanent
code amendments that the Building Code Council is required to adopt pursuant to subsection (d)
of this section, the following shall apply:
(1) With respect to qualifying R-2 buildings as defined in subsection (a) of this
section, the Building Code Council and all local government officials
enforcing the Building Code shall apply the provisions in subsection (c) of
this section regarding single-exit stairway requirements.
(2) The Building Code Council shall adopt permanent rules for qualifying R-2
buildings as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.
SECTION 1.(c) Single-Exit Stairway for Qualifying R-2 Buildings. –
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Building Code or law to the contrary, the Building
Code Council shall amend the Building Code to allow a qualifying R-2 building, as defined in
subsection (a) of this section, to be served by a single-exit stairway in lieu of multiple exits,
provided the building meets either the requirements for mid-rise single-exit buildings in
subdivision (1) of this subsection or the requirements for low-rise single-exit buildings in
subdivision (2) of this subsection, and meets all additional universal requirements set forth in
subdivision (3) of this subsection, described as follows:
(1) Mid-rise single-exit buildings. – A qualifying R-2 building may be served by
a single exit if all of the following are satisfied:
a. The building has no more than eight total stories and has no more than
seven stories above grade plane.
b. There shall be no more than four dwelling units on any floor.
*S492-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. The building shall be of not less than two-hour fire-resistance-rated
construction and shall be equipped throughout with an NFPA 13
automatic sprinkler system in accordance with Section 903.3.1.1 of the
Building Code. Residential-type sprinklers shall be used in all
habitable spaces in each dwelling unit.
(2) Low-rise single-exit buildings. – A qualifying R-2 building may be served by
a single exit if all of the following are satisfied:
a. The building has no more than three total stories, of which no more
than two stories are above grade plane.
b. There shall be no more than six dwelling units on any floor.
c. The building shall be of not less than one-hour fire-resistance-rated
construction or be equipped throughout with an NFPA 13 automatic
sprinkler system in accordance with Section 903.3.1.1 of the Building
Code. Residential-type sprinklers shall be used in all habitable spaces
in each dwelling unit.
(3) Universal requirements for all qualifying R-2 buildings. – A building meeting
the requirements of either subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall also
comply with all of the following to be eligible to be constructed with no more
than one egress stair:
a. Stairway type. – An exterior stairway or an interior exit stairway shall
be provided. Any interior exit stairway, including any related exit
passageway, shall be pressurized in accordance with Section 909.20
of the Building Code or an alternative design approved by a licensed
engineer that achieves an equivalent result. Doors in the stairway shall
swing into the interior exit stairway regardless of occupant load
served. Doors leading from the stairway to the building exterior are
permitted to swing in the direction of exit travel.
b. Corridor separation. – A continuous corridor or exit passageway shall
separate each dwelling unit entry or exit door from the door to an
interior exit stairway or any related exit passageway. A dwelling unit
door shall not open directly into an interior exit stairway but may open
directly to an exterior stairway.
c. Travel distance to stairway. – There shall be no more than 20 feet of
travel from the entry or exit door of any dwelling unit to the nearest
entrance of the exit stairway.
d. Total travel distance. – The total travel distance, measured in
accordance with Section 1017 of the Building Code, from the most
remote point within any dwelling unit to an exit discharge shall not
exceed 125 feet.
e. Egress courts. – The exit serving the qualifying R-2 building shall not
terminate in an egress court where the court depth exceeds the court
width unless it is possible to exit in either direction to the public way.
f. Elevators. – Elevators shall be pressurized in accordance with Section
909.21 of the Building Code, shall open into elevator lobbies that
comply with Section 3006 of the Building Code, or use an alternative
design approved by a licensed engineer that achieves an equivalent
result. Where approved by the code-enforcement official, natural
ventilation is permitted to be substituted for pressurization if it
prevents the accumulation of smoke or toxic gases.
g. Other occupancies. – Other occupancies in the same building are
permitted only if they comply with all requirements of the Building
Page 2 Senate Bill 492-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Code and do not communicate with the Group R-2 occupancy portion
of the building or with the single-exit stairway. Parking garages and
occupied roofs accessory to the Group R-2 occupancy are permitted to
communicate with the exit stairway.
h. Exit discharge. – The exit serving the qualifying R-2 building shall not
discharge through any other occupancy, including any accessory
parking garage.
i. Openings. – There shall be no openings within 10 feet of any
unprotected opening into the exit stairway, other than required exit
doors having a minimum one-hour fire-resistance rating.
(4) Means-of-egress requirements. – A qualifying R-2 building meeting the
requirements of either subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection and subdivision
(3) of this subsection shall be deemed to comply with the means-of-egress
requirements for exit stairways under the North Carolina Fire Code and any
applicable local ordinances.
SECTION 1.(d) Additional Rulemaking Authority. – Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-19(4), the Building Code Council shall adopt rules to amend the Building Code in a
manner substantively identical with subsection (c) of this section, including modifications needed
to incorporate qualifying R-2 buildings as defined in subdivision (a)(4) of this section, and to
make conforming changes throughout the Building Code. Rules adopted pursuant to this section
are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), as though 10
or more written objections had been received as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 1.(e) Sunset. – This section expires on the date that permanent rules
adopted as required by subsection (d) of this section become effective.
SECTION 2. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 492-First Edition Page 3